Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 6
P

ROTECTION OF METROPOLITAN RIVERS

Cross references.

- State-wide water management planning, T. 12, C. 5, A. 8.

Metropolitan North Georgia Water Planning District, T. 12, C. 5, A. 10.

Population bills,

§

28-1-15

.

Editor's notes.

- Several of the Code sections in this part are based on Ga. L. 1973, p. 128 and Ga. L. 1975, p. 837, which Acts were not codified in the legislative edition of the O.C.G.A.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982). For annual survey of law on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (1983). For article, "Hazardous Waste Issues in Real Estate Transactions," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 581 (1987).
For a note discussing the historical aspects and current law concerning the state's ownership rights in tidelands, see 17 Ga. L. Rev. 851 (1983).

12-5-440. Short title.

This part shall be known as and may be cited as the "Metropolitan River Protection Act."

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 1; Code 1981, §

12-5-440

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4.)

12-5-441. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Applicant" means any person who requests the issuance of a certificate under this part.

"Area" means a standard metropolitan statistical area recognized by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, and as set forth in Appendix C, County and City Data Book 1977: A Statistical Abstract Supplement, U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, which is located wholly within the State of Georgia and having a population of more than 1,000,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

Reserved.

"Certificate" means a building permit or other written authorization issued under this part and shall include, as a part thereof, the application and all documents supplied in support thereof and the approval by the governing authority together with any conditions thereto.

(5.1) "Commission" means a regional commission established pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 8 of Title 50, including its predecessor, a "regional development center."

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Flood plain" means that area adjacent to a major stream which is subject to being flooded with a probable frequency of at least once every 100 years. The regional commission shall delineate the flood plain and in doing so may utilize or adopt studies prepared by the Corps of Engineers, United States Army, or such other studies as the regional commission deems competent.

"Governing authority" means the governing authority of a political subdivision or, except for the purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 12-5-445, a committee of such governing authority.

"Impoundment" means any body of water, formed by a dam, which is less than 25,000 acres in size.

"Land-disturbing activity" means scraping, plowing, clearing, dredging, grading, excavating, transporting, or filling of land or placement of any structure or impervious surface, dam, obstruction, or deposit.

"Major stream" means any stream or river, whether navigable or nonnavigable, which flows through any area and which is the source of at least 40 percent of the public water supply of any such area.

"Owner" means the record title owner, according to the deed records, of the land described in an application for a certificate and may or may not be the same person as the applicant. For purposes of this part, if the owner is a corporation, notice shall be given to the legal representative as delineated by records kept in the office of the Secretary of State.

"Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, trust, entity, or authority and shall include the State of Georgia, its political subdivisions, and all its departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, or other agencies.

"Plan" means the comprehensive plan or plans prepared by the regional commission pursuant to Code Section 12-5-443.

"Political subdivision" means a county or a municipality in which the section of the river corridor to be affected or any part thereof is located.

"Public notice" means a legal notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the political subdivision at least once a week for two consecutive weeks.

"Stream corridor" means all land in the area in the watercourse, within 2,000 feet of the watercourse, or within the flood plain, whichever is greater.

"Tributary" means any flowing stream which flows into the major stream at a point which is within the stream corridor.

"Watercourse" means the banks of a major stream, including any impoundments thereon, in the area as defined by the low-water mark of such stream and any impoundments and including the entire bed of such stream and any impoundments and all islands therein, from the point where the stream enters the area downstream to the point where the stream leaves the area.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 837, §§ 1, 2; Code 1981, §

12-5-441

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 9; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, §§ 6.4, 6.5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1394, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 9/HB 1216.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, "Article 2 of Chapter 8 of Title 50" was substituted for "this article" in paragraph (5.1).

12-5-442. Legislative findings and purposes.

The General Assembly finds that adequate supplies of clean water for drinking and other purposes constitute the lifeblood of the great metropolitan areas of this state and are, therefore, essential to the health, welfare, and economic progress of the state; that development adjacent to major streams in certain metropolitan areas requires special regulation to provide adequate protection for public water supplies; that siltation and urban runoff threaten such water supplies; that flood plain development unnecessarily exposes life and property to loss by flooding while increasing flood risks for other areas; that over-intensive development adjacent to major streams increases the frequency and severity of such flooding; that it is in the public interest to avoid future flood damage and possible loss of life, to control erosion and pollution, and to protect the water quality of major streams in certain metropolitan areas.

The General Assembly finds that the stream corridors of major streams in certain metropolitan areas as set forth in this part are vital areas within the meaning of Article III, Section VIII, Paragraph IIIA of the Constitution of the State of Georgia of 1976 and Article III, Section VI, Paragraph II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia of 1983. The purpose of this part is to provide a method whereby political subdivisions in certain metropolitan areas shall utilize the police power of the state, in accordance with a comprehensive plan, to protect consistently the water quality of any major stream, the public water supplies of such political subdivision and of the area, recreational values of the major stream, and private property rights of landowners; to prevent activities which contribute to floods and flood damage; to control erosion, siltation, and intensity of development; to provide for the location and design of land uses in such a way as to minimize the adverse impact of development on the major stream and flood plains; and to provide for comprehensive planning for the stream corridor in such areas.

The General Assembly finds that certain political subdivisions in the included area have in force certain flood plain and sediment control ordinances that afford adequate protection for the aforementioned problems. Nothing in this part shall be construed so as to make those local political subdivision ordinances less stringent than they are now.

The General Assembly intends to authorize and require political subdivisions in any such area to enforce this part so as to protect the watercourse and the adjacent stream corridor. The General Assembly further intends that the state have the authority to enforce this part if the appropriate political subdivisions have failed or refused to do so and if the public interest requires it.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 3; Code 1981, §

12-5-442

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1394, § 2.)

12-5-443. Comprehensive land and water use plan; transmittal of plan to political subdivisions; notice and hearing; promulgation of rules and regulations; application fee.

The commission shall, consistent with the purposes of this part:

Prepare, adopt, and keep up to date one or more comprehensive, coordinated land and water use plans for the stream corridor. The plan, as prepared and approved by the commission, shall set land use criteria for flood and flood damage prevention, erosion and siltation control, water quality protection, and intensity of development in the stream corridor. In preparing, adopting, and updating the plan, the commission shall be authorized to account for the varying characteristics of different sections of the stream corridor and set land use criteria accordingly. At least eight weeks prior to adoption of a plan for all land brought within the stream corridor on or after July 1, 1998, notice that the property is subject to the "Metropolitan River Protection Act," including notice of the process of adoption of the plan to be followed by the commission, shall be provided by United States mail to each property owner within the affected portion of the stream corridor as shown by the prior year's property tax records. The failure of any owner to actually receive such notice shall not affect the applicability of the plan to such owner's property or create any cause of action for damages or equitable relief. The plan, as adopted by the commission, shall be transmitted to each political subdivision by June 16, 1973. The plan as adopted by the commission for any and all land brought within the stream corridor after March 1, 1983, shall be transmitted to each political subdivision and to the director by July 1, 1983. The plan adopted by the commission for any and all land brought within the stream corridor on or after July 1, 1998, shall be transmitted to each political subdivision and to the director by October 1, 1998. The commission may, after hearing, utilize or adopt an existing plan or plans as the plan called for by this part. The commission may from time to time revise the plan or portions thereof, and any such revisions of the plan shall be transmitted promptly after adoption. Prior to the adoption of the plan, or of any substantial portion or any revision of the plan, the commission shall hold a public hearing on the proposed plan, or portion or revision thereof, in each county in which any land affected by the plan or, in the case of a portion or revision of the plan, in which any land affected by such portion or revision lies. The commission shall cause notice of the time and place of each such public hearing to be published once a week for two weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each county in which land to be affected lies. Any such land and water use plan shall be prepared in consultation and with assistance of the county or city governing authority where the land to be affected lies;

Foster and undertake such studies of water and related land resources problems in the stream corridor as are necessary in the preparation or revision of the plan;

Make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this part and to administer and implement this part and all rules, regulations, and orders promulgated under this part. A copy of any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this paragraph by a commission which is also a metropolitan area planning and development commission created pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 8 of Title 50 shall be provided to the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee and the Georgia House of Representatives Natural Resources and Environment Committee; and

Charge a reasonable fee to each applicant for review of any application for a certificate, which fee shall be sufficient to defray all or any portion of the administrative costs of review of the application by the commission and of the cost to the commission of monitoring and inspection of compliance with such certificates.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 837, § 3; Code 1981, §

12-5-443

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 321, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1394, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 25/HB 1216; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 13/HB 117.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, "plans" was substituted for "plan" in the first sentence of paragraph (1).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2009, p. 303,

§

20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act."

12-5-444. Prohibited land and water uses; uses prior to adoption of plan; certificate of compliance with plan; information required of applicant; changes in use; notice and hearing.

Pending adoption of the plan by the commission, it shall be unlawful for any person to erect, maintain, suffer, or permit any structure, dam, obstruction, deposit, clearing, or excavation in or on the stream corridor which will adversely affect the efficiency of or restrict the capacity of the watercourse or flood plain, appreciably increase runoff or flood heights, adversely affect the control, protection, allocation, or utilization of the water and related land resources of the stream corridor, harmfully obstruct or alter the natural flow of flood waters, or harmfully increase erosion, siltation, or water pollution. In order to prevent undue hardship, the commission may, prior to the adoption of the plan by the commission, issue a letter or written statement signed by the executive director of the commission ruling with respect to any proposed land or water use in any political subdivision that none of the above-listed adverse effects will occur as a result of the proposed use. Nothing in this subsection shall apply to a political subdivision that, on June 30, 1973, has in effect a flood plain ordinance and a sediment control ordinance.

Pending adoption of the plan by the commission as to any land brought within the stream corridor after March 1, 1983, it shall be unlawful for any person to engage in any land-disturbing activity in or on such land within the stream corridor which will adversely affect the efficiency of or restrict the capacity of the watercourse or flood plain, appreciably increase runoff or flood heights, adversely affect the control, protection, allocation, or utilization of the water and related land resources of the stream corridor, harmfully obstruct or alter the natural flow of flood waters, or harmfully increase erosion, siltation, or water pollution. In order to prevent undue hardship, the commission may, prior to the adoption of the plan by the commission as to any land brought within the stream corridor after March 1, 1983, issue a letter or written statement signed by the executive director of the commission, ruling with respect to any proposed land-disturbing activity in or on such land that none of the above-listed adverse effects will occur as a result of the proposed use.

Pending adoption of the plan by the commission as to any land brought within the stream corridor on or after July 1, 1998, it shall be unlawful for any person to engage in any land-disturbing activity in or on such land within the stream corridor which will adversely affect the efficiency of or restrict the capacity of the watercourse or flood plain, appreciably increase runoff or flood heights, adversely affect the control, protection, allocation, or utilization of the water and related land resources of the stream corridor, harmfully obstruct or alter the natural flow of flood waters, or harmfully increase erosion, siltation, or water pollution. In order to prevent undue hardship, the commission may, prior to the adoption of the plan by the commission as to any land brought within the stream corridor on or after July 1, 1998, issue a letter or written statement signed by the executive director of the commission, ruling with respect to any proposed land-disturbing activity in or on such land that none of the above-listed adverse effects will occur as a result of the proposed use.

After adoption by the commission of the plan or any portion thereof or any amendment thereto, it shall be unlawful within those areas regulated by the plan or any portion thereof or any amendment thereto for any person to engage in any land-disturbing activity in or on the stream corridor which will be incompatible or inconsistent with the plan or any portion thereof or any amendment thereto. A proposed land or water use shall be deemed to be not in compliance with the plan unless and until the governing authority of the political subdivision issues a certificate for the proposed use pursuant to Code Section 12-5-445.

The governing authority shall, before referring the application to the commission pursuant to Code Section 12-5-445, require the applicant to furnish such detailed information on the proposed land or water use as the governing authority shall reasonably request and as required by the plan and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this part.

Any land-disturbing activity shall be done strictly in accordance with the certificate issued under this part. Any substantial change or modification of a proposed land-disturbing activity for which a certificate has been issued shall require a new certificate, which must be issued in accordance with the requirements of this part.

The governing authority shall adopt ordinances, regulations, or procedures as necessary to assure that any land-disturbing activity is conducted in compliance with the plan and the certificate.

The governing authority shall give public notice of and shall hold a public hearing before issuing or denying any certificate under this Code section. Written notice of the public hearing shall be mailed to the applicant and to the owner at least ten days prior to the hearing. The form and procedure for such hearings shall be determined by the governing authority involved, provided that all interested persons shall be afforded adequate notice of such hearings and an opportunity to be present and express their views. The information required under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be filed in final form and be available for public inspection prior to such hearing.

The governing authority shall delineate and clearly label the stream corridor on the zoning map and the official map of such governing authority.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 837, §§ 4, 5; Code 1981, §

12-5-444

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1394, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 25/HB 1216.)

12-5-445. Review of application and supporting documents by commission; effect of inconsistencies; alternatives where modification recommended.

After receipt of a complete application for a certificate, the governing authority shall transmit to the commission a copy of such complete application and all supporting documents.

If, from the application or from its own investigation, the commission finds that there are inconsistencies between the plan and the land-disturbing activity proposed by the application, the commission may do any one of the following:

Recommend modification of the application in such manner as to be consistent with the plan;

Make a finding that the application, while not consistent with the plan in all respects, will provide a level of land and water resource protection equivalent to an application consistent with the plan; or

Recommend modification of the application in such manner that the application as so modified, while not consistent with the plan in all respects, will provide a level of land and water resource protection equivalent to an application consistent with the plan.

If the commission fails to recommend modification of the application within 60 days from submission of such application to the commission and if the governing authority makes a specific finding that the application is consistent with the plan or makes a specific finding that the application, while not consistent with the plan in all respects, will provide a level of land and water resource protection equivalent to an application consistent with the plan, the governing authority shall be deemed to have complied with this Code section and may issue the certificate.

In any case where the commission has recommended modification of an application, the governing authority may:

Adopt such recommendation, incorporate it as a condition of the certificate, and issue a certificate with such conditions, in which case any land-disturbing activity under the certificate must be strictly in accordance with the recommendation so incorporated;

After making a specific finding that the application is in compliance with the plan or a specific finding that the application, while not consistent with the plan in all respects, will provide a level of land and water resource protection equivalent to an application consistent with the plan, override such recommendation by affirmative vote of a two-thirds' majority of the full membership of the governing body; however, such action by the governing authority is not final unless and until the governing authority:

Following the affirmative vote to override, holds a second public hearing on the application and the proposed override of the commission's recommendation, after giving public notice and after mailing notice to the applicant, the owner, and the commission at least ten days prior to the hearing;

Gives full consideration to all comments made at the second public hearing;

Obtains from the director a written finding that the application is consistent with the plan or, while not consistent with the plan in all respects, will provide a level of land and water resource protection equivalent to an application consistent with the plan; and

Reaffirms the vote to override the commission's recommendation by affirmative vote of a two-thirds' majority of the full membership of the governing authority, after again making a specific finding that the application is in compliance with the plan or a specific finding that the application, while not consistent with the plan in all respects, will provide a level of land and water resource protection equivalent to an application consistent with the plan; or

Request reconsideration of such recommendation by the commission at a public hearing.

If the governing authority fails to take action under either paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection within 45 days after the submission of the recommendation of the commission to the governing authority, the certificate shall not be issued. Where a public hearing is requested under this subsection, such public hearing shall be held by the commission within 30 days after receipt of such request. Notice stating the time and place of the public hearing shall be mailed at least ten days prior to the hearing to the governing authority, the applicant, and the owner and public notice shall be given. The commission shall make its final determination with respect to such recommendation within 30 days after such public hearing. The request for a public hearing under this subsection may be made by the applicant, the owner, or the governing authority involved.

In making the findings required by subsection (b) or by paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section, the commission, the governing authority, and the director shall follow the purposes set forth in this part and the goals set forth by the plan, as amended.

Any finding by the director under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall be appealable under Chapter 13 of Title 50, known as the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," as are final decisions in contested cases.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 6; Ga. L. 1975, p. 837, § 6; Code 1981, §

12-5-445

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 321, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1394, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 25/HB 1216.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, "commission's" was substituted for "center's" in subparagraphs (c)(2)(A) and (c)(2)(D).

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

12-5-446. Prereview by commission of application for certificate; fee where prereview requested by applicant; effectiveness of certificate following prereview; immediate effectiveness of certificate; consultation by commission with governing authority; informal consultation with applicants.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 6, effective March 29, 1983.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1975, p. 837,

§

7 and Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107,

§

4.

12-5-447. Minimum standards for certificates and recommendations.

Every certificate issued by a governing authority and every recommendation of the commission, unless the proposed use is not harmful to the water and land resources of the stream corridor, will not significantly impede the natural flow of flood waters, and will not result in significant land erosion, stream bank erosion, siltation, or water pollution, shall comply with the following minimum standards:

No land or water use shall be permitted in the flood plain; and

No land or water use shall be permitted within 150 horizontal feet of the watercourse.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 8; Code 1981, §

12-5-447

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.9; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 25/HB 1216.)

12-5-448. Appeal.

Any person aggrieved by any final determination, cease and desist order, other order, or other final action of the commission or a governing authority under this part and who has exhausted any administrative remedies may take an appeal to the superior court of the county in which all or part of the land affected lies. The appeal shall be filed within 30 days from the date of the final determination, cease and desist order, other order, or other final action of the governing authority or committee of such governing authority or of the commission. Upon failure to file an appeal within 30 days, the decision of the governing authority or committee of such governing authority or of the commission shall be final. The appeal shall be heard by the judge of the superior court without a jury.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 9; Code 1981, §

12-5-448

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.10; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 25/HB 1216.)

12-5-449. Other laws not superseded by part.

The requirements of this part are in addition to and do not supersede other requirements of law including the zoning and building regulations of the political subdivision involved.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 10; Code 1981, §

12-5-449

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4.)

12-5-450. Election by counties contiguous to area, and by municipalities within county, to come under part.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 9, effective March 29, 1983.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1973, p. 128,

§

11 and Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107,

§

4.

12-5-451. Uses to which part inapplicable.

This part shall not apply to the following uses:

Any land or water use for agriculture or animal husbandry as defined in the ordinances adopted by the governing authority, provided that a buffer of natural vegetation is maintained for a distance of 50 horizontal feet from the bank of the watercourse;

Ordinary maintenance and landscaping operations, except for a distance of 50 horizontal feet from the bank of the watercourse and except for the removal of healthy trees over two inches diameter breast height (DBH) anywhere in the stream corridor;

Any land or water use or project which, on March 16, 1973, is approved, pending, or is completed, actually under construction, or which is zoned for such use and where expenditures in excess of $2,500.00 have been made in preparation for construction in accordance with such zoning; provided, however, that the construction of the project is actually commenced within 36 months of March 16, 1973; otherwise, a certificate for the project must be obtained pursuant to this part;

With regard to any land included in the stream corridor for the first time after March 1, 1983, any land or water use or land-disturbing activity:

Which, on March 1, 1983, is completed, under construction, fully approved by the governing authority, or for which all requests for approval of construction are pending before the governing authority; or

Which is to be located on land which, on March 1, 1983, is zoned for such use and where expenditures in excess of $2,500.00 have been made in preparation for construction in accordance with such zoning; provided, however, prior to March 1, 1984, construction of such land-disturbing activity must have actually commenced and expenditures must have been made in connection with such construction in excess of 10 percent of the estimated cost of the total projected land-disturbing activity, exclusive of the cost of the land, or in excess of $100,000.00, exclusive of the cost of the land, whichever is less; otherwise a certificate for the project must be obtained pursuant to this part.

Upon request by the owner of any land included in the stream corridor for the first time after March 1, 1983, the commission shall make a determination whether any land or water use or land-disturbing activity on such land satisfies the conditions set forth in this paragraph for exclusion from application of this part. Any such request shall be accompanied by any information concerning the land or water use or land-disturbing activity as the commission may reasonably request. If the commission determines that the land or water use or land-disturbing activity fails to satisfy the conditions set forth in this paragraph, the commission shall state the reasons therefor. The commission shall be authorized to delegate this authority to its executive director. If such delegation is made, any person aggrieved by any such determination of the executive director may appeal such determination to the commission within 30 days of the issuance of such determination;

With regard to any land included in the stream corridor for the first time on or after July 1, 1998, any land or water use or land-disturbing activity:

Which on July 1, 1998, is completed, under construction, fully approved by the governing authority, or for which all requests for approval of construction are pending before the governing authority; or

Which is to be located on land which, on July 1, 1998, is zoned for such use and where expenditures in excess of $5,000.00 have been made in preparation for construction in accordance with such zoning; provided, however, that prior to July 1, 1999, construction of such land-disturbing activity must have actually commenced and expenditures must have been made in connection with such construction in excess of 10 percent of the estimated cost of the total projected land-disturbing activity, exclusive of the cost of the land, or in excess of $100,000.00, exclusive of the cost of the land, whichever is less; otherwise a certificate for the project must be obtained pursuant to this part.

Upon request by the owner of any land included in the stream corridor for the first time on or after July 1, 1998, the commission shall make a determination whether any land or water use or land-disturbing activity on such land satisfies the conditions set forth in this paragraph for exclusion from application of this part. Any such request shall be accompanied by any information concerning the land or water use or land-disturbing activity as the commission may reasonably request. If the commission determines that the land or water use or land-disturbing activity fails to satisfy the conditions set forth in this paragraph, the commission shall state the reasons therefor. The commission shall be authorized to delegate this authority to its director. If such delegation is made, any person aggrieved by any such determination of the director may appeal such determination to the commission within 30 days of the issuance of such determination; or

Any land or water use or land-disturbing activity which is undertaken or financed, in whole or in part, by the Department of Transportation of the State of Georgia.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 12; Code 1981, §

12-5-451

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.11; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 12; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1394, § 6; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 25/HB 1216.)

Cross references.

- Stream buffers,

§§

12-2-8

,

12-5-582

,

12-7-6

.

12-5-452. Cease and desist orders; injunctions; land-disturbing activities as nuisances; penalty; jurisdiction of actions.

If a governing authority determines that any person is violating any provision of this part, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part, or the terms and conditions of any certificate issued under this part, the appropriate governing authority shall employ any one or any combination of any or all of the following enforcement methods:

The appropriate governing authority may issue a cease and desist order specifying the provision of this part or the rule or the term or condition of a certificate violated and requiring the person so ordered to cease and desist from such activity and to take corrective action within a reasonable period of time as prescribed in the order. Such corrective action may include, but shall not be limited to, requiring that the affected portion of the stream corridor be returned to its condition prior to the violation insofar as practical. Any such order shall become final unless the person named therein requests in writing a hearing before the governing authority no later than 30 days after the issuance of such order. On the basis of such hearing, the governing authority shall be authorized to continue such order in effect, to revoke the order, or to modify it;

Whenever the appropriate governing authority finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the watercourse and the public interest, the governing authority may issue an emergency cease and desist order, effective immediately, reciting the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken as it deems necessary to meet the emergency. Any person against whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately but, on application to the governing authority, shall be afforded a hearing within five business days. On the basis of such hearing the governing authority shall be authorized to continue such order in effect, to revoke the order, or to modify it;

The appropriate governing authority may seek injunctive relief pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section; or

The governing authority shall be authorized to delegate to a responsible official thereof the authority to issue the orders set forth in this subsection.

Any land-disturbing activity in violation of this part, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part, or any certificate issued pursuant to this part shall be a public nuisance; and the creation and maintenance thereof may be enjoined and abated upon an action being filed by the commission, any political subdivision affected, the director, or any person.

Any person who violates this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part, any certificate issued pursuant to this part, or any final cease and desist order or emergency order issued pursuant to this part may be fined a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each acre or part thereof on which such violation occurs. Each day on which such violation exists is a separate offense.

The superior court having jurisdiction over an action brought pursuant to this Code section shall have the authority to require that the land within the stream corridor be restored to its original condition prior to the unauthorized land-disturbing activity, if possible and if environmentally appropriate. If such restoration is ordered by the court and not carried out within the time limits set forth in a final court order, the governing authority shall be authorized to carry out total or partial restoration within the stream corridor, and the person or persons responsible for the unauthorized land-disturbing activities shall be liable for the amount expended upon restoration. Such amount shall be recoverable by the governing authority in an action against such person or persons.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 128, § 13; Code 1981, §

12-5-452

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1059, § 11; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.12; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 25/HB 1216.)